Utah statutes.
75-2-509.   Revival of revoked will.
(1)  If a subsequent will that wholly revoked a previous will is thereafter
revoked by a revocatory act under Subsection 75-2-507(1)(b), the previous will
remains revoked unless it is revived.  The previous will is revived if it is
evident from the circumstances of the revocation of the subsequent will or
from the testator's contemporary or subsequent declarations that the testator
intended the previous will to take effect as executed.
(2)  If a subsequent will that partly revoked a previous will is thereafter
revoked by a revocatory act under Subsection 75-2-507(1)(b), a revoked part of
the previous will is revived unless it is evident from the circumstances of
the revocation of the subsequent will or from the testator's contemporary or
subsequent declarations that the testator did not intend the revoked part to
take effect as executed.
(3)  If a subsequent will that revoked a previous will in whole or in part is
thereafter revoked by another later will, the previous will remains revoked in
whole or in part, unless it or its revoked part is revived.  The previous will
or its revoked part is revived to the extent it appears from the terms of the
later will that the testator intended the previous will to take effect.
